North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 12. Food, Drugs and Cosmetics.
§ 106-131.
Permits governing manufacture of foods subject to contamination with microorganisms.

Whenever the Commissioner of Agriculture finds after investigation by himself or his duly authorized agents, that the distribution in North Carolina of any class of food may, by reason of contamination with microorganisms during manufacture, processing, or packing thereof in any locality in this State, be injurious to health, and that such injurious nature cannot be adequately determined after such articles have entered commerce, the Commissioner, then, and in such case only, shall promulgate regulations providing for the issuance, to manufacturers, processors, or packers of such class of food in such locality, of permits to which shall be attached such conditions governing the manufacture, processing, or packing of such class of food, for such temporary period of time, as may be necessary to protect the public health; and after the effective date of such regulations, and during such temporary period, no person shall introduce or deliver for introduction into commerce any such food manufactured, processed, or packed by any such manufacturer, processor, or packer unless such manufacturer, processor, or packer holds a permit issued by the Commissioner as provided by such regulations.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized to suspend immediately upon notice any permit issued under authority of this section if it is found that any of the conditions of the permit have been violated. The holder of a permit so suspended shall be privileged at any time to apply for the reinstatement of such permit, and the Commissioner shall immediately after prompt hearing and an inspection of the establishment, reinstate such permit if it is found that adequate measures have been taken to comply with and maintain the conditions of the permit, as originally issued, or as amended.

Any officer or employee duly designated by the Commissioner of Agriculture shall have access to any factory or establishment, the operator of which holds a permit from the Commissioner of Agriculture for the purpose of ascertaining whether or not the conditions of the permit are being complied with, and denial of access for such inspection shall be ground for suspension of the permit until such access is freely given by the operator.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 12.

§ 106-132.
Additives, etc., deemed unsafe.

Any added poisonous or added deleterious substance, any food additive, any pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity or any color additive, shall with respect to any particular use or intended use be deemed unsafe for the purpose of application of

G.S. 106-129(1)

, paragraphs b and g and 106-129(4) with respect to any food, 106-133(1) with respect to any drug or device, or 106-136(1) and (5) with respect to any cosmetic, unless there is in effect a regulation pursuant to

G.S. 106-139

of this Article limiting the quantity of substance, and the use or intended use of such substance conforms to the terms prescribed by such regulation. While such regulations relating to such substance are in effect, a food, drug, or cosmetic shall not, by reason of bearing or containing such substance in accordance with the regulations be considered adulterated within the meaning of

G.S. 106-129(1)

a, 106-133(1) and 106-136(1).

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 13; 1975, c. 614, s. 21.

§ 106-133.
Drugs deemed to be adulterated.

A drug or device shall be deemed to be adulterated:

If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid or decomposed substance; or

If it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under insanitary conditions whereby it may have been contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health; or

If it is a drug and its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health; or

If

It is a drug and it bears or contains, for purposes of coloring only, a color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of

G.S. 106-132

, or

If it is a color additive, the intended use of which in or on drugs is for purposes of coloring only, and is unsafe within the meaning of

G.S. 106-132

;

If it is a drug and the methods used in, or the facilities or controls used for, its manufacture, processing, packing, or holding do not conform to or are not operated or administered in conformity with current good manufacturing practice to assure that such drug meets the requirements of this Article as to safety and has the identity and strength, and meets the quality and purity characteristics, which it purports or is represented to possess.

If it purports to be or is represented as a drug the name of which is recognized in an official compendium, and its strength differs from, or its quality or purity falls below, the standard set forth in such compendium. Such determination as to strength, quality, or purity shall be made in accordance with the tests or methods of assay set forth in such compendium, or in the absence of or inadequacy of such tests or methods of assay, those so prescribed under authority of the federal act. No drug defined in an official compendium shall be deemed to be adulterated under this subdivision because it differs from the standard of strength, quality, or purity therefor set forth in such compendium, if its difference in strength, quality, or purity from such standard is plainly stated on its label. Whenever a drug is recognized in both the United States Pharmacopoeia and the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States it shall be subject to the requirements of the United States Pharmacopoeia unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case it shall be subject to the provisions of the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States and not to those of the United States Pharmacopoeia.

If it is not subject to the provisions of subdivision (2) of this section and its strength differs from, or its purity or quality falls below, that which it purports or is represented to possess.

If it is a drug and any substance has been

Mixed or packed therewith so as to reduce its quality or strength; or

Substituted wholly or in part therefor.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 14; 1975, c. 614, ss. 22-24.

§ 106-134.
Drugs deemed misbranded.

A drug or device shall be deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular, or if its labeling or packaging fails to conform with the requirements of

G.S. 106-139

or 106-139.1 of this Article.

If in package form unless it bears a label containing

The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and

An accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count, which statement shall be separately and accurately stated in a uniform location upon the principal display panel of the label, except as exempted with respect to this clause by

G.S. 106-121(2a)

c of this Article; provided, that under paragraph b of this subdivision reasonable variations shall be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages shall be established, by regulations prescribed by the Board of Agriculture.

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this Article to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, designs or devices, in the labeling) and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

If it is for use by man and contains any quantity of the narcotic or hypnotic substance alphaeucaine, barbituric acid, betaeucaine, bromal, cannabis, carbromal, chloral, coca, cocaine, codeine, heroin, marijuana, morphine, opium, paraldehyde, peyote, or sulphonmethane; or any chemical derivative of such substances, which derivative has been by the Board after investigation, found to be, and by regulations under this Article, designated as, habit forming; unless its label bears the name and quantity or proportion of such substance or derivative and in juxtaposition therewith the statement “Warning — May be habit forming.”

If it is a drug, unless:

Its label bears, to the exclusion of any other nonproprietary name (except the applicable systematic chemical name or the chemical formula),

The established name (as defined in paragraph b of this subdivision) of the drug, if such there be, and

In case it is fabricated from two or more ingredients the established name and quantity of each active ingredient, including the kind and quantity or proportion of any alcohol and also including, whether active or not, the established name and quantity or proportion of any bromides, ether, chloroform, acetanilid, acetphenetidin, amidopyrine, antipyrine, atropine, hyoscine, hyoscyamine, arsenic, digitalis, digitalis glucosides, mercury, ouabain, strophanthin, strychnine, thyroid, or any derivative or preparation of any such substances, contained therein: Provided, that the requirement for stating the quantity of the active ingredients, other than the quantity of those specifically named in this subdivision, shall apply only to prescription drugs; and

For any prescription drug the established name of such drug or ingredient, as the case may be, on such label (and on any labeling on which a name for such drug or ingredient is used) is printed prominently and in type at least half as large as that used thereon for any proprietary name or designation for such drug or ingredient; and provided, that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of 1 II or 2 of this subdivision is impracticable, exemptions shall be allowed under regulations promulgated by the Board.

As used in this subdivision (5), the term “established name,” with respect to a drug or ingredient thereof, means:

The applicable official name designated pursuant to section 508 of the federal act, or

If there is no such name and such drug, or such ingredient, is an article recognized in an official compendium, then the official title thereof, in such compendium, or

If neither 1 nor 2 of this paragraph applies, then the common or usual name, if any, of such drug or of such ingredient:

Provided further, that where 2 of this sub-subdivision applies to an article recognized in the United States Pharmacopoeia and in the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia under different official titles, the official title used in the United States Pharmacopoeia shall apply unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case the official title used in the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia shall apply.
(6)

Unless its labeling bears

a.

Adequate directions for use; and

b.

Such adequate warnings against use in those pathological conditions or by children where its use may be dangerous to health, or against unsafe dosage or methods or duration of administration or application, in such manner and form, as are necessary for the protection of users: Provided, that where any requirement of paragraph a of this subdivision, as applied to any drug or device, is not necessary for the protection of the public health, the Board of Agriculture shall promulgate regulations exempting such drug or device from such requirements.

(7)

If it purports to be a drug the name of which is recognized in an official compendium, unless it is packaged and labeled as prescribed therein: Provided, that the method of packing may be modified with the consent of the Board of Agriculture. Whenever a drug is recognized in both the United States Pharmacopoeia and the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, it shall be subject to the requirements of the United States Pharmacopoeia with respect to packaging and labeling unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case it shall be subject to the provisions of the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States and not to those of the United States Pharmacopoeia.

(8)

If it has been found by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to be a drug liable to deterioration, unless it is packaged in such form and manner, and its label bears a statement of such precautions, as the Board of Agriculture shall by regulations require as necessary for the protection of public health. No such regulation shall be established for any drug recognized in an official compendium until the Commissioner of Agriculture shall have informed the appropriate body charged with the revision of such compendium of the need for such packaging or labeling requirements and such body shall have failed within a reasonable time to prescribe such requirements.

(9) a.

If it is a drug and its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading; or

b.

If it is an imitation of another drug; or

If it is offered for sale under the name of another drug.

(10)

If it is dangerous to health when used in the dosage, or with the frequency or duration prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof.

(11),

(12) Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 614, s. 28.

(13)

If it is, or purports to be, or is represented as a drug composed wholly or partly of insulin, unless:

a.

It is from a batch with respect to which a certificate or release has been issued pursuant to section 506 of the federal act, and

b.

Such certificate or release is in effect with respect to such drug.

(14)

If it is, or purports to be, or is represented as a drug composed wholly or partly of any kind of penicillin, streptomycin, chlortetracycline, chloramphenicol, bacitracin, or any other antibiotic drug, or any derivative thereof, unless

a.

It is from a batch with respect to which a certificate or release has been issued pursuant to section 507 of the federal act, and

b.

Such certificate or release is in effect with respect to such drug:

Provided, that this subsection shall not apply to any drug or class of drugs exempted by regulations promulgated under section 507(c) or (d) of the federal act. For the purpose of this subsection the term “antibiotic drug” means any drug intended for use by man containing any quantity of any chemical substance which is produced by microorganisms and which has the capacity to inhibit or destroy microorganisms in dilute solution (including the chemically synthesized equivalent of any such substance).

(15)

If it is a color additive, the intended use of which in or on drugs is for the purpose of coloring only, unless its packaging and labeling are in conformity with such packaging and labeling requirements applicable to such color additive, prescribed under the provisions of

G.S. 106-132

of this Article.

(16)

In the case of any prescription drug distributed or offered for sale in this State, unless the manufacturer, packer, or distributor thereof includes in all advertisements and other descriptive printed matter issued or caused to be issued by the manufacturer, packer, or distributor with respect to that drug a true statement of

a.

The established name, as defined in

G.S. 106-134(5)

b of this Article, printed prominently and in type at least half as large as that used for any trade or brand name thereof,

b.

The formula showing quantitatively each ingredient of such drug to the extent required for labels under section 502(e) of the federal act, and

c.

Such other information in brief summary relating to side effects, contraindications, and effectiveness as shall be required in regulations issued under the federal act.

(17)

If a trademark, trade name or other identifying mark, imprint or device of another or any likeness of the foregoing has been placed thereon or upon its container with intent to defraud.

(18)

If it is a drug and its packaging or labeling is in violation of an applicable regulation issued pursuant to section 3 or 4 of the Federal Poison Prevention Packaging Act of 1970.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 15; 1949, c. 370; 1973, c. 831, s. 1; 1975, c. 614, ss. 25-28, 30; 1997-261, s. 33.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “When Market Forces Fail: The Case for Federal Regulation of Insulin Prices,” see 42 Campbell L. Rev. 311 (2020).

§ 106-134.1.
Prescriptions required; label requirements; removal of certain drugs from requirements of this section.

A drug intended for use by man which:

Is a habit-forming drug to which

G.S. 106-134(4)

applies; or

Because of its toxicity or other potentiality for harmful effect, or the method of its use, or the collateral measures necessary to its use, is not safe for use except under the supervision of a practitioner licensed by law to administer such drug in the course of his normal practice; or

Is limited by an approved application under section 505 of the federal act to use under the professional supervision of a practitioner licensed by law to administer such drug; or

Is a drug the label of which bears the statement “Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without a prescription,” shall be dispensed only

Upon a written prescription of a practitioner licensed by law to administer such drug, or authorized to issue orders pursuant to G.S. 90-87(23)(a), provided that the written prescription must bear the printed or stamped name, address, telephone number and DEA number of the prescriber in addition to his legal signature, or

Upon an oral prescription of such practitioner which is reduced promptly to writing and filed by the pharmacist, or

By refilling any such written or oral prescription if such refilling is authorized by the prescriber either in the original prescription or by oral order which is reduced promptly to writing and filed by the pharmacist. If any prescription for such drug does not indicate the times it may be refilled, if any, such prescription may not be refilled unless the pharmacist is subsequently authorized to do so by the practitioner.

The act of dispensing a drug contrary to the provisions of this subdivision shall be deemed to be an act which results in a drug being misbranded while held for sale.

Any drug dispensed by filling or refilling a written or oral prescription of a practitioner licensed by law to administer such drug shall be exempt from the requirements of

G.S. 106-134

, except subsections (1), (9)b and c, (13) and (14), and the packaging requirements of subsections (7) and (8), if the drug bears an affixed label containing the name of the patient, the name and address of the pharmacy, the phrase “Filled by _______________ ” or “Dispensed by _______________ ,” with the name of the practitioner who dispenses the prescription appearing in the blank, the serial number and date of the prescription or of its filling, the name of the prescriber, the directions for use, and unless otherwise directed by the prescriber of such drug, the name and strength of such drug. This exemption shall not apply to any drugs dispensed in the course of the conduct of a business of dispensing drugs pursuant to diagnosis by mail, or to a drug dispensed in violation of subsection (a) of this section.Any tranquilizer or sedative dispensed by filling or refilling a written or oral prescription of a practitioner licensed by law to administer such drug shall be labelled by the pharmacist, if the prescriber so directs on the prescription, with a warning that: “The consumption of alcoholic beverages while on this medication can be harmful to your health.”

The Board may, by regulation, remove drugs subject to

G.S. 106-134(4)

and

G.S. 106-135

from the requirements of subsection (a) of this section when such requirements are not necessary for the protection of the public health. Drugs removed from the prescription requirements of the federal act by regulations issued thereunder shall also, by regulations issued by the Board, be removed from the requirement of subsection (a).

A drug which is subject to subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed to be misbranded if at any time prior to dispensing its label fails to bear the statement “Caution: Federal Law Prohibits Dispensing Without Prescription.” A drug to which subsection (a) of this section does not apply shall be deemed to be misbranded if at any time prior to dispensing its label bears the caution statement quoted in the preceding sentence.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve any person from any requirement prescribed by or under authority of law with respect to drugs now included or which may hereafter be included within the classification of “controlled substances” as this term is defined in applicable federal and State controlled substance acts.

History.

1975, c. 614, s. 29; 1977, c. 421; 1979, c. 626; 1981, c. 75, s. 2.

§ 106-135.
Regulations for sale of new drugs.

No person shall sell, deliver, offer for sale, hold for sale or give away any new drug unless:

An application with respect thereto has been approved and said approval has not been withdrawn under section 505 of the federal act, or

When not subject to the federal act, by virtue of not being a drug in interstate commerce, unless such drug has been tested and has been found to be safe for use and effective in use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof, and prior to selling or offering for sale such drug, there has been filed with the Commissioner an application setting forth

Full reports of investigations which have been made to show whether or not such drug is safe for use and whether such drug is effective in use;

A full list of the articles used as components of such drug;

A full statement of the composition of such drug;

A full description of the methods used in, and the facilities and controls used for, the manufacture, processing, and packing of such drug;

Such samples of such drug and of the articles used as components thereof as the Commissioner may require; and

Specimens of the labeling proposed to be used for such drug.

An application provided for in subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall become effective on the one hundred eightieth day after the filing thereof, except that if the Commissioner finds, after due notice to the applicant and giving him an opportunity for hearing,

That the drug is not safe or not effective for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended or suggested in the proposed labeling thereof; or

The methods used in, and the facilities and controls used for, the manufacture, processing and packing of such drug is inadequate to preserve its identity, strength, quality, and purity; or

Based on a fair evaluation of all material facts, such labeling is false or misleading in any particular; he shall, prior to the effective date of the application, issue an order refusing to permit the application to become effective.

An order refusing to permit an application under this section to become effective may be revoked by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall promulgate regulations for exempting from the operation of the foregoing subsections and subdivisions of this section drugs intended solely for investigational use by experts qualified by scientific training and experience to investigate the safety and effectiveness of drugs. Such regulations may, within the discretion of the Commissioner among other conditions relating to the protection of the public health, provide for conditioning such exemption upon

The submission to the Commissioner, before any clinical testing of a new drug is undertaken, of reports, by the manufacturer or the sponsor of the investigation of such drug, of preclinical tests (including tests on animals) of such drug adequate to justify the proposed clinical testing;

The manufacturer or the sponsor of the investigation of a new drug proposed to be distributed to investigators for clinical testing obtaining a signed agreement from each of such investigators that patients to whom the drug is administered will be under his personal supervision, or under the supervision of investigators responsible to him, and that he will not supply such drug to any other investigator, or to clinics, for administration to human beings; and

The establishment and maintenance of such records, and the making of such reports to the Commissioner, by the manufacturer or the sponsor of the investigation of such drug, of data (including but not limited to analytical reports by investigators) obtained as the result of such investigational use of such drug, as the Commissioner finds will enable him to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of such drug in the event of the filing of an application pursuant to subsection (b).

Such regulations shall provide that such exemption shall be conditioned upon the manufacturer, or the sponsor of the investigation, requiring that experts using such drugs for investigational purposes certify to such manufacturer or sponsor that they will inform any human beings to whom such drugs, or any controls used in connection therewith, are being administered, or their representatives, that such drugs are being used for investigational purposes and will obtain the consent of such human beings or their representatives, except where they deem it not feasible, or, in their professional judgment, contrary to the best interests of such human beings. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require any clinical investigator to submit directly to the Commissioner reports on the investigational use of drugs; provided, that regulations adopted under section 505(i) of the federal act may be adopted by the Commissioner as the regulations in this State.

In the case of any drug for which an approval of an application filed pursuant to this section is in effect, the applicant shall establish and maintain such records, and make such reports to the Commissioner, of data relating to clinical experience and other data or information, received or otherwise obtained by such applicant with respect to such drug, as the Commissioner may by general regulation, or by order with respect to such application, prescribe: Provided, however, that regulations and orders issued under this subsection and under subsection (d) shall have due regard for the professional ethics of the medical profession and the interests of patients and shall provide, where the Commissioner deems it to be appropriate, for the examination, upon request, by the persons to whom such regulations or orders are applicable, of similar information received or otherwise obtained by the Commissioner.

Every person required under this section to maintain records, and every person in charge or custody thereof, shall, upon request of an officer or employee designated by the Commissioner, permit such officer or employee at all reasonable times to have access to and copy and certify such records.

The Commissioner may, after affording an opportunity for public hearing, revoke an application approved pursuant to this section if he finds that the drug, based on evidence acquired after such approval, may not be safe or effective for its intended use, or that the facilities or controls used in the manufacture, processing, or labeling of such drug may present a hazard to the public health.

This section shall not apply:

To a drug sold in this State or introduced into interstate commerce at any time prior to the enactment of the federal act, if its labeling contained the same representations concerning the conditions of its use; or

To any drug which is licensed under the Public Health Service Act of July 1, 1944 (58 Stat. 682, as amended; 42 U.S.C. 201 et seq.) or under the Animal Virus-Serum-Toxin Act of March 4, 1913 (13 Stat. 832; 21 U.S.C. 151 et seq.); or

To any drug which is subject to G.S. 106-134(14) of this Article.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 16; 1975, c. 614, s. 31.

§ 106-136.
Cosmetics deemed adulterated.

A cosmetic shall be deemed to be adulterated:

If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it injurious to users under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement thereof, or under such conditions of use as are customary or usual: Provided, that this provision shall not apply to coal-tar hair dye, the label of which bears the following legend conspicuously displayed thereon: “Caution — This product contains ingredients which may cause skin irritation on certain individuals and a preliminary test according to accompanying directions should first be made. This product must not be used for dyeing the eyelashes or eyebrows; to do so may cause blindness,” and the labeling of which bears adequate directions for such preliminary testing. For the purposes of this subdivision and subdivision (5) the term “hair dye” shall not include eyelash dyes or eyebrow dyes.

If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance.

If it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under insanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health.

If its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health.

If it is not a hair dye and it is, or it bears or contains a color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of

G.S. 106-132

.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 17; 1975, c. 614, s. 32.

§ 106-137.
Cosmetics deemed misbranded.

A cosmetic shall be deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular; or

If its labeling or packaging fails to conform with the requirements of

G.S. 106-139

and 106-139.1 of this Article.

If in package form unless it bears a label containing

The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and

An accurate statement of the quantity, of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count, which statement shall be separately and accurately stated in a uniform location upon the principal display panel of the label: Provided, that under paragraph b of this subdivision reasonable variations shall be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages shall be established by regulations prescribed by the Board of Agriculture.

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this Article to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling) and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

If its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading.

If it is a color additive, unless its packaging and labeling are in conformity with such packaging and labeling requirements applicable to such color additive prescribed under the provisions of

G.S. 106-132

of this Article. This subdivision shall not apply to packages of color additives which, with respect to their use for cosmetics, are marketed and intended for use only in or on hair dyes (as defined in the last sentence of G.S. 106-136(1)).

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 18; 1975, c. 614, ss. 33-35.

§ 106-138.
False advertising.

An advertisement of a food, drug, device or cosmetic shall be deemed to be false if it is false or misleading in any particular.

For the purpose of this Article the advertisement of a drug or device representing it to have any effect in albuminuria, appendicitis, arteriosclerosis, blood poison, bone disease, Bright’s disease, cancer, carbuncles, cholecystitis, diabetes, diphtheria, dropsy, erysipelas, gallstones, heart and vascular diseases, high blood pressure, mastoiditis, measles, meningitis, mumps, nephritis, otitis, media, paralysis, pneumonia, poliomyelitis, (infantile paralysis), prostate gland disorders, pyelitis, scarlet fever, sexual impotence, sinus infection, smallpox, tuberculosis, tumors, typhoid, uremia, or venereal diseases, shall also be deemed to be false; except that no advertisement not in violation of subsection (a) shall be deemed to be false under this subsection if it is disseminated only to members of the medical, dental, pharmaceutical, or veterinary professions, or appears only in the scientific periodicals of these professions, or is disseminated only for the purpose of public health education by persons not commercially interested, directly or indirectly, in the sale of such drugs or devices: Provided, that whenever the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services determines that an advance in medical science has made any type of self-medication safe as to any of the diseases named above, the Board shall by regulation authorize the advertisement of drugs having curative or therapeutic effect for such disease, subject to such conditions and restrictions as the Board may deem necessary in the interest of public health: Provided, that this subsection shall not be construed as indicating that self-medication for diseases other than those named herein is safe or efficacious.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 19; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-139.
Regulations by Board of Agriculture.

The authority to promulgate regulations for the efficient enforcement of this Article is hereby vested in the Board of Agriculture, except the Commissioner of Agriculture is hereby authorized to promulgate regulations under

G.S. 106-131

and 106-135. The Board and Commissioner are hereby authorized to make the regulations promulgated under this Article conform, insofar as practicable, with those promulgated for foods, drugs, devices, cosmetics and consumer commodities under the federal act, including but not limited to pesticide chemical residues on or in foods, food additives, color additives, special dietary foods, labeling of margarine for retail sale or distribution, nutritional labeling of foods, the fair packaging and labeling of consumer commodities and new drug clearance. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (e) of this section, a federal regulation adopted by the Board or Commissioner pursuant to this Article shall take effect in this State on the date it becomes effective as a federal regulation.

The Board may promulgate regulations exempting from any affirmative labeling requirement of this Article consumer commodities which are, in accordance with the practice of the trade, to be processed, labeled or repacked in substantial quantities at establishments other than those where originally processed or packed, on condition that such consumer commodities are not adulterated or misbranded under the provisions of this Article upon removal from such processing, labeling or repacking establishment. The Board may additionally promulgate regulations exempting from any labeling requirement of this Article foods packaged or dispensed at the direction of the retail purchaser at the time of sale, whether or not for immediate consumption by the purchaser on the premises of the seller.

Whenever the Board determines that regulations containing prohibitions or requirements other than those prescribed by G.S. 106-139.1(a) are necessary to prevent the deception of consumers or to facilitate value comparisons as to any consumer commodity, the Board shall promulgate with respect to that commodity regulations effective to:

Establish and define standards for the characterization of the size of a package enclosing any consumer commodity, which may be used to supplement the label statement of net quantity of contents of packages containing such commodity, but this paragraph shall not be construed as authorizing any limitation of the size, shape, weight, dimensions, or number of packages which may be used to enclose any commodity;

Regulate the placement upon any package containing any commodity or upon any label affixed to such commodity, of any printed matter stating or representing by implication that such commodity is offered for retail sale at a price lower than the ordinary and customary retail sale price or that a retail sale price advantage is accorded to purchasers thereof by reason of the size of that package or the quantity of its contents;

Require that the label on each package of a consumer commodity bear

The common or usual name of such consumer commodity, if any, and

In case such consumer commodity consists of two or more ingredients, the common or usual name of each such ingredient listed in order of decreasing predominance, but nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to require that any trade secret be divulged; or

Prevent the nonfunctional slack-fill of packages containing consumer commodities.For the purposes of subdivision (4) of this subsection, a package shall be deemed to be nonfunctionally slack-filled if it is filled of substantially less than its capacity for reasons other than

Protection of the contents of such package, or

The requirements of machines used for enclosing the contents in such package;

provided, the Board may adopt any regulations promulgated pursuant to the Federal Fair Packaging and Labeling Act which shall have the force and effect of law in this State.

Hearings authorized or required by

G.S. 106-131

or

G.S. 106-135

shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 827, s. 30.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 20; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 614, s. 36; 1987, c. 827, s. 30.

§ 106-139.1.
Declaration of net quantity of contents.

All labels of consumer commodities, as defined by this Article, shall conform with the requirement for the declaration of net quantity of contents of section 4 of the Federal Fair Packaging and Labeling Act (15 U.S.C. 1451, et seq.) and the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto: Provided, that consumer commodities exempted from such requirements of section 4 of the Federal Fair Packaging and Labeling Act shall also be exempt from this subsection.

The label of any package of a consumer commodity which bears a representation as to the number of servings of such commodity contained in such package shall bear a statement of the net quantity (in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count) of each such serving.

No person shall distribute or cause to be distributed in commerce any packaged consumer commodity if any qualifying words or phrases appear in conjunction with the separate statement of the net quantity of contents required by subsection (a) of this section, but nothing in this section shall prohibit supplemental statements, at other places on the package, describing in nondeceptive terms the net quantity of contents: Provided, that such supplemental statements of net quantity of contents shall not include any term qualifying a unit of weight, measure, or count that tends to exaggerate the amount of the commodity contained in the package.

History.

1975, c. 614, s. 37.